Utah statutes.
75-7-804.   Prudent administration.
A trustee shall administer the trust as a prudent person would, by considering
the purposes, terms, distributional requirements, and other circumstances of
the trust.  In satisfying this standard, the trustee shall exercise reasonable
care, skill, and caution.
